Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 24. Court Reorganization

§ 9-2-2401.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1998 ch 109 § 1, related to reorganization plan for courts, purpose, plan and schedule, and establishment of judicial planning commission.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.